Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.003

State board of osteopathic medicine and surgery—Membership—Qualifications—Officers—Meetings—Compensation and travel expenses—Removal.

There is hereby created an agency of the state of Washington, consisting of eleven individuals appointed by the governor to be known as the Washington state board of osteopathic medicine and surgery.

On expiration of the term of any member, the governor shall appoint for a period of five years a qualified individual to take the place of such member. Each member shall hold office until the expiration of the term for which such member is appointed or until a successor shall have been appointed and shall have qualified. Initial appointments shall be made and vacancies in the membership of the board shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment by the governor.

Each member of the board shall be an actual resident of this state. Two members must be consumers who have neither a financial nor a fiduciary relationship to a health care delivery system, and every other member must have been in active practice as a licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon in this state for at least five years immediately preceding appointment.

The board shall elect a chairperson and a vice chairperson from its members. Meetings of the board shall be held at least four times a year and at such place as the board shall determine and at such other times and places as the board deems necessary.

A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

Each member of the board shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265 and shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. The board is a class five group for purposes of chapter 43.03 RCW.

Any member of the board may be removed by the governor for neglect of duty, misconduct, malfeasance or misfeasance in office, or upon written request of two-thirds of the physicians licensed under this chapter and in active practice in this state.

[ 2022 c 240 s 28; (2022 c 240 s 27 expired July 1, 2022); 2020 c 80 s 14; 2017 c 101 s 1; 1991 c 160 s 2; 1984 c 287 s 42; 1979 c 117 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 240 s 28: "Section 28 of this act takes effect July 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 240 s 36.]

Expiration date—2022 c 240 s 27: "Section 27 of this act expires July 1, 2022." [ 2022 c 240 s 35.]

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Legislative findings—Severability—Effective date—1984 c 287: See notes following RCW 43.03.220.

Secretary of health or designee ex officio member of health professional licensure and disciplinary boards: RCW 43.70.300.